Vermont, session 2025-2026, H304.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 4(44) is amended to read:
(44) “Moving violation” means any violation of any provision of this
title, while the motor vehicle is being operated on a public highway, over
which operation the operator has discretion as to commission of the act, except
for offenses pertaining to:
(A) a parked vehicle, equipment, size, weight, inspection, or
registration of the vehicle;
VT LEG #380676 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.304
2025 Page 2 of 6
(B) child restraint or safety belt systems or seat belts as required in
section 1258 or 1259 of this title; or
(C) motorcycle headgear under section 1256 of this title; or
(D) passing a school bus under section 1075 of this title.
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 1075 is amended to read:
§ 1075. PASSING SCHOOL BUS
(a) The operator of a motor vehicle, including authorized emergency
vehicles under section 1015 of this title, upon meeting or overtaking a vehicle
marked and equipped as provided in section 1283 of this title that has stopped
on the highway for the purpose of receiving or discharging public or private
schoolchildren, shall stop his or her the operator’s vehicle immediately and
shall keep it stationary while the flashing red signal lights are in operation.
(b) The driver of a vehicle need not stop upon a highway with separate
roadways upon meeting or overtaking a school bus that is on a different
roadway, or upon a controlled access highway where the school bus is stopped
in a loading zone that is a part of or adjacent to the highway at a point where
pedestrians are not permitted to cross the roadway.
(c) A law enforcement officer shall issue a Vermont Civil Violation
Complaint for a traffic violation for the violation of subsection (a) of this
section to the registered owner of a motor vehicle identified by number plate
within 10 days after a school bus operator attests in a writing made under the
VT LEG #380676 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.304
2025 Page 3 of 6
penalty of perjury that the motor vehicle bearing that number plate passed a
stopped school bus in violation of subsection (a) of this section, provided that
the writing also includes the date, time, and location of the violation; the
writing is made within five days after the date of the violation; and one or more
images clearly showing the motor vehicle bearing that number plate passing a
stopped school bus in violation of subsection (a) of this section are attached to
the writing.
Sec. 3. 23 V.S.A. § 1283 is amended to read:
§ 1283. IDENTIFICATION AND EQUIPMENT OF SCHOOL BUSES
(a) Types I and II school buses shall be:
* * *
(4) Equipped with a system of signal lamps approved by the
Commissioner, including an eight-light system on any new or used school bus
ordered on and after July 1, 1976. The driver of a Type I or a Type II school
bus shall keep the alternately flashing red signal lamps lighted whenever
school children are being received or discharged, and they shall be used only
for that purpose. A school bus driver found in violation of this subdivision
shall be guilty of a traffic violation.
* * *
(6) Equipped with a live digital video school bus passing violation
detection monitoring system that:
VT LEG #380676 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.304
2025 Page 4 of 6
(A) is operational whenever the school bus is on, even if the school
bus is idling;
(B) includes one or more camera sensors and computers that produce
live digital and recorded video images of motor vehicles operated in violation
of section 1075 of this title with the date, time, and location of the violation;
(C) only records images of the number plates of motor vehicles
operated in violation of section 1075 of this title and does not record images of
the occupants of motor vehicles or any other individuals; and
(D) only preserves video or images for up to 90 days, whether on the
monitoring system or otherwise, unless the school bus operator attests to a
violation under subsection 1075(c) of this title, in which case the video or
image or images shall be preserved until the traffic violation is dismissed or the
applicable civil penalty is collected and then destroyed.
(7) In compliance with the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards for
school buses as of the date of manufacture.
(b) Any school bus meeting the identification requirements of subdivisions
(a)(1)–(4) of this section that is permanently converted for use wholly for
purposes other than transporting pupils to or from school, or transporting
organized groups of preschool or school-age children, shall be painted a color
other than national school bus glossy yellow and shall have the stop arm, if
any, and equipment required by this section removed.
VT LEG #380676 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.304
2025 Page 5 of 6
(c) Type I and Type II school buses being operated on a public highway
and transporting primarily passengers other than school pupils shall have the
words “School Bus” covered, removed, or otherwise concealed, and the stop
arms and equipment permitted by this section and section 1281a of this title
shall not be operable through the usual controls.
(d) No motor vehicle other than a school bus shall display the identifying
equipment and signs required by this section.
Sec. 4. 23 V.S.A. § 2502 is amended to read:
§ 2502. POINT ASSESSMENT; SCHEDULE
(a) Unless the assessment of points is waived by a Superior judge or a
Judicial Bureau hearing officer in the interests of justice and in accordance
with subsection 2501(b) of this title, a person operating a motor vehicle shall
have points assessed against his or her the person’s driving record for
convictions for moving violations of the indicated motor vehicle statutes in
accord with the following schedule: (All references are to this title of the
Vermont Statutes Annotated.)
* * *
(4) Five points assessed for:
* * *
(B) § 1075. Illegal passing of school bus; [Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #380676 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.304
2025 Page 6 of 6
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on August 1, 2026 and first apply to school buses
operated during the 2026–2027 school year.
VT LEG #380676 v.1